apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/zeumowe__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumíwey</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumíwey</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>eleumewo</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eleumewo</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>eleumewo</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeumowe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>eleumiwy</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eleumiwy</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleuwoo</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleuwoo</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleumywe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleumywe</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eileumiwy</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eileumiwy</l> 
        <r>zeumowe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="/emadohe__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwo</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>elemadoho</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elemadoho</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylemamuwoo</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylemamuwoo</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emadohe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylemémudoho</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylemémudoho</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>emamuwuey</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emamuwuey</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleumywe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleumywe</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylemamuwi</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylemamuwi</l> 
        <r>emadohe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="emadohe"><par n="/emadohe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zeumowe"><par n="/zeumowe__vblex"/></e>
